Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-379
Boat dealer trailer plate; fee.

Any boat dealer when transporting a boat which is part of the inventory of the boat dealer on a trailer required to be registered may annually, in lieu of registering the trailer and upon application to the department and payment of a fee of ten dollars, obtain a certificate and a license plate. The plate may be displayed on any trailer owned by the boat dealer when the trailer is transporting such a boat. The license plate shall be of a type designed by the department and so numbered as to distinguish one plate from another.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 79.